Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 6. Contested Cases
§ 27-14-605.
Application for modification of benefits; time limitation; grounds; termination of case; exceptions.

If a determination is made in favor of or on behalf of an employee for any benefits under this act, an application may be made to the division by any party within four (4) years from the date of the last payment for additional benefits or for a modification of the amount of benefits on the ground of increase or decrease of incapacity due solely to the injury, or upon grounds of mistake or fraud. The division may, upon the same grounds and within the same time period, apply for modification of medical and disability benefits to a hearing examiner or the medical commission, as appropriate.

Any right to benefits shall be terminated and is no longer under the jurisdiction of this act if a claim for any benefit is not filed with the division within the four (4) year limitation prescribed under subsection (a) of this section.

A claim for medical benefits which would otherwise be terminated under subsection (b) of this section and barred under W.S. 27-14-503(a) and (b) may be paid by the division if the claimant:

Submits medical reports to the division substantiating his claim;

Proves by competent medical authority and to a reasonable degree of medical certainty that the condition is directly related to the original injury; and

Submits to an examination by a health care provider selected by the division and results of the examination validate his claim.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 229, § 1; 1994, ch. 86, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Applicability. —

In a decision applying the second compensable injury rule, the claimant need not comply with the provisions of this section, because the case is not actually being reopened; this section applies to original benefits awarded after a determination in favor of the employee, but medical benefits and temporary total disability benefits awarded at a later date pursuant to the second compensable injury rule are not among the benefits the statute controls. Yenne-Tully v. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 12 P.3d 170,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2000).

Second compensable injury rule did not apply where claimant did not contend that bilateral wrist tendinitis or his wearing of a wrist splint for that originally diagnosed condition caused his thoracic outlet syndrome. Decker v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2005 WY 160, 124 P.3d 686,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 189

(Wyo. 2005).

Where the Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division did not contest the compensability of an original claim or seek to retract any payments already made to a benefits claimant, but challenged the right to payment of future benefits, this section was not applicable. The claimant was required to prove that he was entitled to receive benefits for his unpaid claims, despite the previous award.
McIntosh v. State ex rel. Wyo. Med. Comm'n, 2007 WY 108, 162 P.3d 483,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2007).

Hearing examiner explicitly acknowledged that the stricter burden of proof of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-605

was not applicable, and referred to the second compensable injury rule as being more lenient; the hearing examiner's finding that the employee was required to show the causal connection to a reasonable degree of medical probability, rather than requiring the employee to show that the second injury was “due solely to” the original compensable injury, indicated the hearing examiner used the proper burden of proof.
In re Worker's Comp. Claim of Roger Kaczmarek Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety, 2009 WY 110, 215 P.3d 277,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Sept. 3, 2009).

Employee was not entitled to worker's compensation benefits for chiropractic treatment in 2010 based on a workplace fall in 2002 because the evidence failed to show that the employee's 2010 condition was directly related to the back injuries suffered in 2002.
Rogers v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2012 WY 117, 284 P.3d 815,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2012).

Section supersedes Wyo. R. Civ. P. 60(b). —

Where benefits have been awarded to a workers' compensation claimant, this section's specific language regarding the reopening of the workers' compensation case supersedes the general provisions regarding relief from judgment found in Wyo. R. Civ. P. 60(b). Erhart v. Flint Eng'g & Constr., 939 P.2d 718,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1997); Shaffer v. State, 960 P.2d 504,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1998).

Section balances concept of finality with need to assure injured workmen receive benefits. —

An award, being characterized as a judicial determination, is subject to the concept of finality. Given this proposition, this section represents an attempt by the legislature to balance the concept of finality as applied to worker's compensation awards with the need to assure that injured workmen receive the full amount of any benefits to which they are entitled under the law. Conn v. Ed Wederski Constr. Co., 668 P.2d 649,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1983), overruled in part, Slater v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Slater), 2001 WY 29, 18 P.3d 1195,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2001).

Second compensable injury rule. —

Under the second compensable injury rule, the claimant must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the injury for which he is seeking benefits resulted from his prior work accident, not a preexisting condition. Walsh v. Holly Sugar Corp. (In re Walsh), 931 P.2d 241,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1997).

Worker's benefits claim should have been analyzed pursuant to the second compensable injury rule and the hearing examiner erred in determining the claim pursuant to this section; the four-year statute of limitations did not apply and the worker sufficiently raised the second compensable injury theory to alert the hearing examiner to his theory of recovery. Carabajal v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2005 WY 119, 119 P.3d 947,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2005).

Where an initial compensable injury ripens into a condition requiring additional medical intervention, the second compensable injury rule is applicable, as it is palpably unjust to the employee to deny him compensation because he tries to keep his place on the employer's pay roll by doing his regular work and then finds that conditions produced at the time of the accident, have gradually and ultimately produced a compensable injury. Yenne-Tully v. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 12 P.3d 170,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2000).

Second compensable injury rule inapplicable. —

Medical benefits and temporary total disability benefits awarded at a later date pursuant to the second compensable injury rule are not among the benefits this section controls. Rather, this section rests on the premise that following an initial determination in favor of an injured employee, any party may, within four years of the award, seek to modify the benefits awarded. Casper Oil Co. v. Evenson, 888 P.2d 221,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1995).

Whether injury is compensable is question of fact.

State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Jerding, 868 P.2d 244,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1994).

Fraud must occur in connection with award for injury. —

This section cannot be perceived as foreclosing worker's compensation benefits that were not fraudulently obtained simply because of inaccuracies uttered in obtaining the employment; the fraud to which this section alludes must occur in connection with the award for the injury. Forni v. Pathfinder Mines, 834 P.2d 688,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 1992).

District court clerk was not proper party to request reopening

under this section, and district court therefore had no jurisdiction to proceed with case because of the absence of any pleading sufficient to invoke the power of the court. R.L. Manning Co. v. Millsap, 687 P.2d 252,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 337

(Wyo. 1984).

Workers' compensation
benefits were properly awarded to an injured employee who was determined
to be an alien not authorized to be in or work in the United States
because the employer reasonably believed, based on documentation
and
information provided, that the employee was authorized to work
in
the United States, even though this was later found to be false.
Moreover,
the employee did not misrepresent the facts of his injury
to receive
benefits, and there was no reasonable nexus between the
misrepresentations
he made to gain employment and his application
for benefits for the
work-related injury he subsequently suffered. L & L Enters. v. Arellano (In re Arellano), 2015 WY 21, 344 P.3d 249,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2015).

No need to “reopen” case. —

Defendant's case did not need to be “reopened”, pursuant to this section, where the Division did not claim, nor did the hearing examiner find, that defendant's initial injury was not compensable or that worker's compensation benefits were awarded by mistake, nor did the Division seek repayment of previously paid benefits. Snyder v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 957 P.2d 289,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1998).

It is obligation of injured employee to plead statutory ground for reopening.

FMC v. Lane, 773 P.2d 163,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1989).

And hearing officer must find statutory ground. —

The failure of an independent hearing officer to make required findings of fact regarding the existence of a statutory basis for reopening the case violated the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act (chapter 3 of title 16) and necessitated remanding the case for further proceedings. FMC v. Lane, 773 P.2d 163,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 1989).

Determination of permanent effect of original disability. —

A workers' compensation claimant's application for permanent benefits, after the claimant had received total temporary benefits, was a new claim for benefits that did not entail an increase or decrease in disability, to which this section would apply, but rather a determination as to the permanent effect of the original disability. Tenorio v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 931 P.2d 234,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1997), reh'g denied,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. Feb. 4, 1997).

Division cannot stipulate reopening of case. —

Where the workers' compensation division entered into a stipulation stating that a workman had a right to reopen his case, the stipulation vitiated the division's option to contest the reopening of the case on the grounds of res judicata, and the worker still carried his burden to demonstrate the existence of a mistake which would justify the reopening of his case and the award of additional benefits. Warehime v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 806 P.2d 292,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1991).

Determination made in favor of employee. —

Administrative hearing officer did not err in ruling that injured employee was not entitled to reopen his workers' compensation case, since this section restricts reopening of cases to those in which a determination has been made in favor of or on behalf of an employee. Bila v. Accurate Telecom, 964 P.2d 1270,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1998).

Division may reopen case to terminate benefits. —

While the legislature has created a vehicle whereby the division, among others, may reopen a case on the grounds of mistake or fraud but has ostensibly limited the remedy available to that of “modification,” no public policy favors the payment of any portion of an unjustified worker's compensation claim. Therefore, the division may petition to reopen a case under subsection (a) for the purpose of terminating worker's compensation benefits originally awarded by mistake or procured by fraud. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Jerding, 868 P.2d 244,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1994).

Where benefits denied. —

A workers' compensation claimant was precluded from reopening his case, in which he was denied benefits, pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Erhart v. Flint Eng'g & Constr., 939 P.2d 718,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1997); Shaffer v. State, 960 P.2d 504,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1998).

District court properly affirmed the Medical Commission's denial of a worker's application for additional temporary total disability benefits and the second compensable injury rule because the evidence revealed that there was no increase in incapacity, and that any claimed increase was due to at least in part a degenerative process, and was, therefore, not solely caused by his work injury, the statute was clear and unambiguous, the Commission did not misapply the second compensable injury rule by requiring the worker to prove that he had suffered a second injury, and the Commission properly weighed the evidence and made appropriate determinations as to the credibility of the witnesses. Kebschull v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2017 WY 94, 399 P.3d 1249,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2017).

Application for modification not submitted. —

No issue with respect to a 1994 claim was before the hearing examiner for adjudication and, therefore, the only issue to be decided at the hearing was the benefit available to the claimant if he proved his 1998 claim by a preponderance of the evidence. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Conner, 12 P.3d 707,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 2000).

Relief for “mistake” limited to mistake in determination of material fact. —

The failure of the Worker's Compensation Division to divulge the reasons behind its conclusion that appellant was entitled to a 17% additional award was a procedural error, not one of fact; such an error is not contemplated as grounds for modification under the statute. Howton v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div. (In re Workers' Compensation Claim of Howton), 899 P.2d 869,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

“Mistake in law” presented in direct appeal, not pursuant to this section. —

An alleged “mistake in law” as to an earlier court order terminating benefits should have been presented in a direct appeal from that order and not pursuant to this section. The finality of awards made under this chapter is relaxed only to the extent that the claimant meets the burden of establishing: (1) a mistake in determination of a material fact; (2) fraud; or (3) increase in incapacity due solely to the injury. Prentice Clark House v. State, 701 P.2d 1162,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1985).

Court terminates benefits where mistake made regarding claimant's employment status. —

Trial court did not abuse its discretion in granting claimant relief from worker's compensation orders and terminating her benefits, where there was a mistake made in the employer's accident report regarding claimant's status as a “sales clerk.” Mini Mart v. Wordinger, 719 P.2d 206,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1986).

Mistake of material fact and procedural misunderstanding insufficient for modification. —

Injured employee failed to meet her burden of showing that mistake of material fact was made by fact finder, and procedural misunderstanding on part of employee and her doctor regarding availability of future benefits was insufficient to support a modification of her benefits under this section. Smith v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 965 P.2d 687,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1998), overruled in part, Slater v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (In re Slater), 2001 WY 29, 18 P.3d 1195,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2001).

Notification based on unilateral mistake. —

A settlement agreement between a claimant and the division of workers' safety and compensation is not a contract which can be modified only in the event of mutual mistake, and a hearing examiner properly modified an award based on a unilateral mistake made by the division in its calculations. Slater v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2001 WY 29, 18 P.3d 1195,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2001).

Illegal contract to surrender right to reopen. —

Injured workman cannot legally surrender right to reopen original workmen's compensation award and there is no consideration for contract between employer and employee that employer would employ injured worker for life in lieu of further compensation. Horvath v. Sheridan-Wyoming Coal Co., 58 Wyo. 211, 131 P.2d 315,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1942).

Worker not entitled to reopen case following written settlement stipulation. —

A settlement stipulation, acquiesced to by the district court, although no order was entered expressly approving the stipulation, and the accompanying orders of award were judicial determinations to be accorded finality. The worker was not entitled to reopen the case, as the written stipulation did not violate constitutional and statutory provisions prohibiting contractual devices to relieve an employer from a liability created by the worker's compensation laws. Further, the worker was not entitled to a hearing on his petition to reopen the case, as there was no factual dispute, the petition being subject to dismissal by operation of a legal bar. Herring v. Welltech, Inc., 715 P.2d 553,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 509

(Wyo. 1986).

Employees who are seeking additional benefits pursuant to this section have the same burden of proof as they had in their original worker's compensation claims. Employees must demonstrate by a preponderance of the evidence that, through an increase in incapacity due solely to the injury, they are entitled to be awarded additional benefits. Whether an increase in incapacity is due solely to the original work-related injury is a question of fact. Jackson v. J.W. Williams, Inc., 886 P.2d 601,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1994).

Estoppel not applicable to outstanding claims. —

Although the employer and the Workers' Compensation Division did not contest the compensability of the initial injury, the employer and Division were not estopped from objecting to an employee's outstanding claims, since each new claim or award involves a separate administrative determination under §

27-14-606

, and the employee had the burden of proving that he was entitled to receive worker's compensation benefits for his outstanding claims. Martinez v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. (In re Martinez), 917 P.2d 619,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1996).

Wyoming Workers' Safety and Compensation Division's uncontested payment in the past of a claimant's claims related to syncope episodes, short losses of consciousness, did not preclude the Division from contesting the causation of the claimant's syncope for purposes of future benefits. Hood v. State ex rel. Dep't of Workforce Servs., Workers' Comp. Div., 2016 WY 104, 382 P.3d 772,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2016).

Doctor's testimony concerning causal connection disregarded where conflicting with immediate version of accident. —

It was within the trial court's province to disregard the testimony of the doctor concerning the causal connection between an industrial accident and the employee's present condition when it was in conflict with the version of the accident related immediately after the event. In re Jones, 702 P.2d 1299,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 511

(Wyo. 1985).

Evidence insufficient to prove causation of increased incapacity. —

In a proceeding to modify an award, brought by a worker who suffered a back injury, received benefits, underwent back surgery and suffered a heart attack, the worker's main witness, his back surgeon, did not state that the heart attack was due solely to the injury, but merely that it occurred shortly after surgery. That was insufficient to prove that the worker's increase in incapacity caused by the heart attack was due solely to the surgery. In re Injury to Loveday, 711 P.2d 396,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 615

(Wyo. 1985).

Evidence insufficient to support highter PPI rating. —

Where the employee failed to offer any evidentiary basis to support a higher permanent partial impairment (PPI) rating than the 15 percent she had already been awarded, specifically where she did not present any credible evidence that her other physical impairments such as her thoracic or shoulder conditions were related to her work accident and did not present any medical evidence that her cervical spine condition was improperly rated, the medical commission hearing panel correctly refused to grant the employee a PPI rating above the 15 percent awarded. Himes v. Petro Eng. & Constr. (In re Workers Comp. Claim), 2003 WY 5, 61 P.3d 393,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2003).

No increase in incapacity due to condition resulting from mundane activities. —

The district court correctly found that an injured worker, who suffered from a herniated disc, had failed to meet his burden of proof of showing an increase in incapacity due solely to the injury or the existence of a mistake. The diagnostic testing immediately following the injury did not disclose a herniated disc. The herniated disc was present later, but the medical experts agreed that it could have resulted from mundane activities. Hunteman v. Ward Transp., 706 P.2d 1126,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 571

(Wyo. 1985).

No increased disability due to natural degeneration. —

An injured worker's problems following his accident were attributable to natural degeneration, as accelerated by the accident. He failed to prove any increase in disability due solely to his injury. Lehman v. State, 752 P.2d 422,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1988).

When unjust to deny compensation for injury. —

It is unjust to an employee to deny him compensation because he had tried to keep his place on an employer's payroll by doing his regular work and then found that conditions produced at the time of an accident, and which medical science could not recognize or whose final consequences it could not forecast, have gradually and ultimately produced a compensable injury. Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Worker's Comp. Div. v. Barnes, 587 P.2d 214,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1978).

It would do violence to the Worker's Compensation Act if, merely because an employee is aware at the time of an accident that a compensable injury may manifest itself in another compensable injury some time in the future, that knowledge will bar a future claim based upon the earlier accident and injury. Wyoming State Treas. ex rel. Worker's Comp. Div. v. Barnes, 587 P.2d 214,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1978).

Increase of incapacity due solely to injury. —

Under §§ 27-14-404(b) and 27-14-605(a), a claimant who had previously accepted a permanent partial impairment award was entitled to additional benefits following surgery if she could prove that she suffered an increase of incapacity due solely to her injury; however, this did not mean that she had to prove she suffered an increase in permanent incapacity, and a showing of a temporary increase was sufficient. Hernandez v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. 1, Hernandez v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. 1 (In re Hernandez), 8 P.3d 318,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2000).

No sound basis articulated for awarding additional benefits. —

See In re Injury to Lea, 707 P.2d 754,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 592

(Wyo. 1985).

Agency reversed where reasons for action not disclosed. —

An agency will be reversed if the reasons underlying the action are not disclosed, whether the final conclusion of the agency is correct or not because without such enunciation the supreme court cannot perform its legislatively mandated review. Howton v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div. (In re Workers' Compensation Claim of Howton), 899 P.2d 869,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

Failure of agency to explicate basis for award abuse of discretion. —

The Administrative Procedure Act requires agencies to disclose by the evidence and the record the facts upon which its actions are based; failure of the agency to explicate its reasons for reaching an award of 17% was an abuse of discretion on the part of the agency. Howton v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div. (In re Workers' Compensation Claim of Howton), 899 P.2d 869,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 1995), reh'g denied,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. Aug. 15, 1995).

Benefits paid for surgery related to injury. —

This section does not foreclose the payment of benefits for surgical procedures relating to an injury even though a period of more than four years has elapsed from the last award, where no application for permanent partial disability or any rating has been made and further treatment was, and is, contemplated. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Malkowski, 741 P.2d 604,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1987).

Time period extended upon judicial determination. —

Order entered by the district court which provided for the payment of temporary total disability payments was a judicial determination which extended the time for a petition to reopen to four years. Deroche v. R.L. Manning Co., 737 P.2d 332,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1987).

Application for reinstatement of benefits not untimely. —

Trial court erred in upholding the denial of TTD benefits to an employee because pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 27-14-404(d), the employee was entitled to apply for reinstatement of TDD benefits under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

27-14-605

as the payment of benefits had ceased for a period of eight days or more; a physician's order that the employee was not to work was evidence of increased incapacity within the meaning of §

27-14-605

.Boe v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers'
Safety & Comp. Div., 2009 WY 115, 216 P.3d 494,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Sept. 17, 2009).

Claimant's burden of proof,

when applying to reopen the case and modify benefits received under this section, is the same burden as exists in the original claim. He must prove by a preponderance of the evidence that there has occurred an increase in incapacity due solely to the injury, or mistake or fraud in connection with the initial award. Woodman v. Grace Bomac Drilling, 736 P.2d 313,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 453

(Wyo. 1987).

Where claimant did not allege any mistake or fraud, he had the burden to establish an increase or decrease in incapacity due solely to the injury. Deroche v. R.L. Manning Co., 737 P.2d 332,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 445

(Wyo. 1987).

Where worker makes no claim to additional compensation based on the grounds of mistake or fraud, he must show that he has sustained additional incapacity entirely as a result of the injury in order to collect additional benefits. Loghry v. Capshaw Well Serv., 739 P.2d 1227,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 472

(Wyo. 1987)(burden not met).

Claimant’s burden of proof. —

Wyoming Workers'
Safety and Compensation Division's award of permanent partial impairment
benefits in 1990 did not, by itself, satisfy an employee's burden
of proving that his abdominal pain was related to his 1982 workplace
injury to his toe; the Division's award was not a final adjudication
that precluded it from challenging future benefits.
Jacobs v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2013 WY 62, 301 P.3d 137,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. 2013).

Additional benefits upon becoming temporarily, totally disabled. —

An employee who received a lump sum permanent partial disability award, and later became temporarily and totally disabled after rod removal surgery, sustained an increase of incapacity and was therefore entitled to additional benefits, regardless of whether his permanent partial disability had increased. Parnell v. State, 735 P.2d 1367,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 428

(Wyo. 1987).

Additional surgery not required. —

The only prerequisites for additional benefits under subsection (a) are that the claimant has previously been awarded either temporary total disability or permanent partial disability benefits and, not meeting the first alternative of § 27-14-404(b), has met the second alternative by filing a petition to reopen and modify under § 27-14-605(a); it is not necessary for the claimant to undergo additional surgery following the previous award. Osenbaugh v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 10 P.3d 544,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 2000).

Modification of award for increased incapacity. —

The trial court properly granted modification of an award due to increased incapacity where (1) the employee's theory was that she experienced an increase of incapacity due solely to the injury when her physician ordered her not to work, (2) the employee submitted a physician's certification of temporary total disability, and (3) there was nothing to indicate that the physician was mistaken in ordering the employee not to work. State ex rel. State Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. v. Henriksen, 2001 WY 42, 21 P.3d 1185,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2001).

Amount awarded for attorney's compensation modifiable. —

The district court could hear an appeal from a hearing examiner's order reducing the compensation of an attorney for a worker's compensation claimant, and could modify the order, where the court found the amount awarded was unreasonable and the hearing examiner provided no factual or legal basis to justify the fee reduction. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div. v. Brown, 805 P.2d 830,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1991).

Effect of claimant not being afforded a hearing. —

Subsection (a) does not differentiate between those unsuccessful claimants who have had hearings and those unsuccessful claimants who have not had hearings. Shaffer v. State, 960 P.2d 504,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1998).

Construction of application as Rule 60(b) motion. —

The claimant's application to reopen his workers' compensation case under subsection (a) would not be construed as being a motion for relief under W.R.C.P 60(b) where the record did not show that the workers' compensation and safety division violated the workers' compensation law. Shaffer v. State, 960 P.2d 504,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1998).

Applied

in

Bohren v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Compensation Div., 883 P.2d 355,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1994); Stockdale v. Transystems Servs., Inc., 908 P.2d 980,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1995); Fritz v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 937 P.2d 1345,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 1997); State ex rel. Wyo. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2016 WY 111, 384 P.3d 267,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2016).

Quoted

in

Jackson v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 786 P.2d 874,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1990); In re Worker's Compensation Claim of Bobby Joe Pickens Ex Rel. Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2006 WY 54, 134 P.3d 1231,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. May 4, 2006); Kenyon v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2011 WY 14, — P.3d —,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Feb. 2, 2011).

Cited

in

E.H. Oftedal & Sons v. Thompson, 966 P.2d 977,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1998); Pohl v. Bailey Co., 980 P.2d 816,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1999); Whiteman v. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 987 P.2d 670,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1999); Hall v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div., 2001 WY 136, 37 P.3d 373,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 2001); Newman v. State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div., 2002 WY 91, 49 P.3d 163,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2002); Phillips v. TIC—Phillips v. TIC-The Industrial Co. of Wyoming, Inc. (In re Phillips) 2005 WY 40, 109 P.3d 520,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(2005); In re Worker's Compensation Claim v. State Ex Rel. Wyoming Med. Comm'n & Wyoming Workers' Safety & Compensation Div., 2005 WY 104, 118 P.3d 441,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(2005); Jacobs v. State Ex Rel. Wyo. Workers' Safety & Comp. Div. (in re Worker's Comp. Claim), 2009 WY 118, 216 P.3d 1128,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Sept. 25, 2009).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Workers' compensation: incarceration as terminating benefits, 54 ALR4th 241.

Workers' compensation: reopening lump-sum compensation payment, 26 ALR5th 127.